California statutes. Education Code
(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, revenue bonds issued under this chapter are not and shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, and are not and shall not be deemed to be a pledge of the faith and credit of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, other than the authority. Revenue bonds of the authority shall be payable solely from funds provided under this chapter.

(2) Each revenue bond of the authority
 shall include a statement on the face of the bond that neither the State of California nor the authority is obligated to pay the principal or interest thereon, except from revenues of the authority, and shall also include a statement that neither the faith or credit, nor the taxing power of the State of California, or any political subdivision, is pledged to the payment of the principal or interest of the bonds.

(3) The issuance of revenue bonds under this chapter shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state, or any political subdivision thereof, to levy or pledge any form of taxation, or make any appropriation for their payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Rulemaking [67329.7. - 67329.7.]

67329.7.

Each authority may adopt, amend, or repeal rules and regulations pursuant to this chapter as emergency regulations. The adoption, amendment, or repeal of these regulations is conclusively presumed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare within the meaning of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Reporting [67329.8. - 67329.8.]

67329.8.

Each authority shall provide a report to the Department of Finance and the budget committees of the Assembly and Senate by March 15, 2025. The report shall include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information:

(a) The number of projects receiving loans.

(b) The total dollar amount of loans made.

(c) The dollar amount of the loan provided for each project.

(d) The terms of the loan for each project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Administrative Costs [67329.9. - 67329.9.]

67329.9.

Each authority may charge against the fund its administrative costs, which shall not exceed 3 percent of the authority’s respective allocation amount or proportion of the fund, as the fund may be augmented by revenue bonds over time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.3. Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1988 [67330. - 67343.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [67330. - 67332.]

67330.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67331.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s economic and social prosperity relies on a higher education system that keeps pace with California’s growth. In the coming decades, the state’s economic prosperity will depend on increasing the productivity of the work force and on the ability to compete successfully in the world marketplace.

(b) The system of public higher education in this state includes the University of California, the California State University, the California community colleges, and the California Maritime Academy. Each of these institutions plays a vital role in maintaining California’s dominance in higher education in the United States.

(c) Over the last several years, studies have been completed by the University of California, the California State University, and the California community colleges to assess their long-term and short-term capital needs, which studies demonstrate that these needs total, in the aggregate, several billion dollars.

(d) The purpose of the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1988 is to assist in meeting the capital outlay financing needs of California’s public higher education system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67332.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 67353.

(b) “Fund” means the 1988 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund created pursuant to Section 67333.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Higher Education Facilities Bond Act Program [67333. - 67334.]

67333.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the 1988 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67334.

(a) The committee shall be and is hereby authorized to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of funding aid to the University of California, the California State University, the California community colleges, and the California Maritime Academy for the construction, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures, renovation, and reconstruction of facilities, for the acquisition of sites upon which these facilities are to be constructed, for the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities, and to provide funds for payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings.

(b) Moneys made available under Section 67340 or 67342 may be used to provide short-term loans to community colleges for the purchase of instructional equipment. Those loans shall be repaid from the first moneys available in the Capital Outlay Fund for Public Higher Education beginning in the 1989–90 fiscal year, or from proceeds of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [67335. - 67343.]

67335.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of six hundred million dollars ($600,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 67343, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the committee at such different times as necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67336.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter. For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the State Public Works Board is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67337.

The committee shall authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter only to the extent necessary to fund the apportionments that are expressly authorized by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Pursuant to that legislative direction, the committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in Section 67334 and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67338.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67339.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum which is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 67340, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67340.

For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, together with interest at the rate paid on moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from money received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67340.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

67341.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67342.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board for a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, and may execute those documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. The loan shall be deposited in the fund for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The amount of the loan shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67343.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded by the issuance and sale or exchange of refunding bonds in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The approval by the electors of this state of the issuance and sale of bonds under this chapter includes approval of the issuance and sale or exchange of any bonds issued to refund either those bonds or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 78 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.4. Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of June 1990 [67345. - 67347.9.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [67345. - 67345.2.]

67345.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of June 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67345.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s economic and social prosperity relies on a higher education system that keeps pace with California’s growth. In the coming decades, the state’s economic prosperity will depend on increasing the productivity of the work force and on the ability to compete successfully in the world marketplace.

(b) The system of public higher education in this state includes the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and the California Maritime Academy. Each of these institutions plays a vital role in maintaining California’s dominance in higher education in the United States.

(c) Over the last several years, studies have been completed by the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges to assess their long-term and short-term capital needs. Those studies demonstrate that the long-term and short-term needs total, in the aggregate, several billion dollars.

(d) The purpose of the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of June 1990 is to assist in meeting the capital outlay financing needs of California’s public higher education system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67345.2.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 67353.

(b) “Fund” means the June 1990 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund created pursuant to Section 67346.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Higher Education Facilities Bond Act Program [67346. - 67346.5.]

67346.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the June 1990 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67346.5.

(a) The committee shall be and is hereby authorized to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of funding aid to the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, the college named in Section 92200, and the California Maritime Academy for the construction, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures, the construction or improvement of off-campus facilities of the California State University approved by the Trustees of the California State University on or before July 1, 1990, renovation, and reconstruction of facilities, for the acquisition of sites upon which these facilities are to be constructed, and for the equipping of new,
 renovated, or reconstructed facilities, and to provide funds for payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings. The addition of the college named in Section 92200 to this section is not intended to mark a change from the funding authorizations made by Section 67354, as contained in the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1986, or Section 67334, as contained in the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1988, but is intended to more clearly state what was intended by the Legislature in those sections as well.

(b) Moneys made available under Section 67347.5 or 67347.7 may be used to provide short-term loans to community colleges for the purchase of instructional equipment. Those loans shall be repaid from the first moneys available in the Capital Outlay Fund for Public Higher Education beginning in the 1990–91 fiscal year, or from proceeds of the
 bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 7.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [67347. - 67347.9.]

67347.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of four hundred fifty million dollars ($450,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 67347.8, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the committee at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67347.1.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter. For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, except as specified in Section 67347.7, each state agency administering an appropriation of the bond fund is designated the “board” for the projects funded by those appropriations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67347.2.

The committee shall authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter only to the extent necessary to fund the apportionments that are expressly authorized by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Pursuant to that legislative direction, the committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in Section 67346.5 and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67347.3.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67347.4.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum which is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 67347.5, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67347.5.

For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, together with interest at the rate paid on moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from money received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67347.6.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67347.7.

(a) The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board for a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, and may execute those documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. The loan shall be deposited in the fund for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The amount of the loan shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) For the purposes of requesting Pooled Money Investment Board loans in accordance with this section, “board” means: the President of the University of California, the Dean of the
 college named in Section 92200, the Chancellor of the California State University, the President of the California Maritime Academy, and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, each acting independently on their own behalf.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 8.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

67347.8.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded by the issuance and sale or exchange of refunding bonds in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The approval by the electors of this state of the issuance and sale of bonds under this chapter includes approval of the issuance and sale or exchange of any bonds issued to refund either those bonds or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67347.9.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or the State General Obligation Bond Law set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter the interest on which is intended to be excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, the Treasurer shall be authorized to maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and the investment earnings on these proceeds, and the Treasurer shall be authorized to use or direct the use of these proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or to take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law so as to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 121 at the June 5, 1990, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.5. Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1986 [67350. - 67357.5.]

67350.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 56 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67351.

The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code) is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this chapter, and the provisions of that law are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set out in full in this chapter. All references in this chapter to “herein” shall be deemed to refer both to this chapter and that law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 56 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67352.

As used in this chapter, and for the purposes of this chapter as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the State Public Works Board.

(b) “Committee” means the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee, created pursuant to Section 67353.

(c) “Fund” means the Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund, created pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 67354.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 56 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67353.

The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee is hereby created, consisting of the Governor, the Controller, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, the President of the University of California, the Chancellor of the California State University, and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or their designees. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 56 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67354.

(a) For the purpose of funding aid to the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, and the California Maritime Academy for the construction, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures, renovation, and reconstruction of facilities, for the acquisition of sites upon which these facilities are to be constructed, for the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities, which equipment shall have a useful life of at least 10 years, to provide funds for payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings, and to provide funds to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, the committee shall be and is hereby authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) in the manner provided in this chapter, but not in excess thereof.

(b) The committee shall authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter only to the extent necessary to fund the apportionments that are expressly authorized by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Pursuant to that legislative direction, the committee shall determine when the bonds authorized under this chapter shall be issued in order to fund the authorized apportionments, and the amount of the bonds to be issued and sold.

(c) Up to two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) shall be available for apportionment in the 1986–87 fiscal year, and up to one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) shall be available for apportionment for the 1987–88 fiscal year, and in each subsequent fiscal year, except that the maximum aggregate debt or liability amount set forth in subdivision (a) shall not be exceeded. 

(d) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the committee at such different times as necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(e) The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 56 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67354.5.

The proceeds of the bonds may also be used to provide short-term loans to community colleges for the purchase of instructional equipment. Those loans shall be repaid from the first moneys available in the Capital Outlay Fund for Public Higher Education beginning in the 1987–88 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 56 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67355.

All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as is required to pay the principal and interest on the bonds as herein provided, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue, to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect the additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 56 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67356.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this chapter, an amount that will equal the following:

(a) The sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum as is necessary to carry out Section 67357, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 56 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67357.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has by resolution authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter. Any moneys made available under this section to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund, together with interest in the amount that those moneys would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, which repayment shall be made from moneys received from the sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 56 at the November 4, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67357.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 67358 (as added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.6. Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of June 1992 [67358. - 67359.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [67358. - 67358.2.]

67358.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of June 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67358.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s economic and social prosperity relies on a higher education system that keeps pace with California’s growth. In the coming decades, the state’s economic prosperity will depend on increasing the productivity of the work force and on the ability to compete successfully in the world marketplace.

(b) The system of public higher education in this state includes the University of California containing 9 campuses, the California State University containing 20 campuses, the California Community Colleges consisting of 71 districts containing 107 campuses, the college named in Section 92200, the California Maritime
 Academy, and their respective off-campus centers. Each of these institutions plays a vital role in maintaining California’s dominance in higher education in the United States.

(c) Over the last several years, studies have been completed by the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges to assess their long-term and short-term capital needs. Those studies demonstrate that the long-term and short-term needs total, in the aggregate, several billion dollars.

(d) The purpose of the Higher Education Facilities Bond Act of June 1992 is to assist in meeting the capital outlay financing needs of California’s public higher education system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 9.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

67358.2.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee created pursuant to Section 67353.

(b) “Fund” means the 1992 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund created pursuant to Section 67358.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Higher Education Facilities Bond Act Program [67358.3. - 67358.4.]

67358.3.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the 1992 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 153 at the June 2, 1992, election.)
-------------------------------------------

67358.4.

The committee shall be and is hereby authorized to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of funding aid to the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, the college named in Section 92200, and the California Maritime Academy for the construction, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures; the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities; funding for the payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings; renovation and reconstruction of facilities; and the construction or improvement of off-campus facilities of the California State University approved by the Trustees of the
 California State University on or before July 1, 1990, including the acquisition of sites upon which these facilities are to be constructed.
